Wyoming, session 2026, SF0072.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-26-101 and 21-26-102 are created
to read:

CHAPTER 26
INTERSTATE TEACHER MOBILITY COMPACT

21-26-101. Short title.
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the
"Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact."

21-26-102. Compact provisions generally.

ARTICLE I
PURPOSE

The purpose of this compact is to facilitate the mobility
of teachers across the member states, with the goal of
supporting teachers through a new pathway to licensure.
Through this compact, the member states seek to establish a
collective regulatory framework that expedites and enhances
the ability of teachers to move across state lines.

This compact is intended to achieve the following
objectives and should be interpreted accordingly. The
member states hereby ratify the same intentions by
subscribing hereto:

A. Create a streamlined pathway to licensure mobility
for teachers;
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244

B. Support the relocation of eligible military
spouses;

C. Facilitate and enhance the exchange of licensure,
investigative and disciplinary information between the
member states;

D. Enhance the power of state and district level
education officials to hire qualified, competent teachers
by removing barriers to the employment of out-of-state
teachers;

E. Support the retention of teachers in the
profession by removing barriers to relicensure in a new
state; and

F. Maintain state sovereignty in the regulation of
the teaching profession.

ARTICLE II
DEFINITIONS

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
As used in this compact, and except as otherwise provided,
the following definitions shall govern the terms herein:

A. "Active military member" means any person with
full-time duty status in the armed forces of the United
States, including members of the national guard and
reserve;

B. "Adverse action" means any limitation or
restriction imposed by a member state's licensing
authority, such as revocation, suspension, reprimand,
probation or limitation on the licensee's ability to work
as a teacher;

C. "Bylaws" means those bylaws established by the
commission;

D. "Career and technical education license" means a
current, valid authorization issued by a member state's
licensing authority allowing a person to serve as a teacher
in P-12 public educational settings in a specific career
and technical education area;

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
E. "Charter member state" means a member state that
has enacted legislation to adopt this compact where such
legislation predates the initial meeting of the commission
after the effective date of this compact;

F. "Commission" means the interstate administrative
body which membership consists of delegates of all states
that have enacted this compact, and which is known as the
interstate teacher mobility compact commission;

G. "Commissioner" means the delegate of a member
state;

H. "Eligible license" means a license to engage in
the teaching profession which requires at least a
bachelor's degree and the completion of a state approved
program for teacher licensure;

I. "Eligible military spouse" means the spouse of any
person in full-time duty status in the active armed forces
of the United States including members of the national
guard and reserve moving as a result of a military mission
or military career progression requirements or are on their
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
terminal move as a result of separation or retirement (to
include surviving spouses of deceased military members);

J. "Executive committee" means a group of
commissioners elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and
within the powers granted to them by, the commission as
provided for herein;

K. "Licensing authority" means an official, agency,
board or other entity of a state that is responsible for
the licensing and regulation of teachers authorized to
teach in P-12 public educational settings;

L. "Member state" means any state that has adopted
this compact, including all agencies and officials of such
a state;

M. "Receiving state" means any state where a teacher
has applied for licensure under this compact;

N. "Rule" means any regulation promulgated by the
commission under this compact, which shall have the force
of law in each member state;
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244

O. "State" means a state, territory or possession of
the United States and the District of Columbia;

P. "State practice laws" means a member state's laws,
rules and regulations that govern the teaching profession,
define the scope of such profession and create the methods
and grounds for imposing discipline;

Q. "State specific requirement" means a requirement
for licensure covered in coursework or examination that
includes content of unique interest to the state;

R. "Teacher" means a person who currently holds an
authorization from a member state that forms the basis for
employment in the P-12 public schools of the state to
provide instruction in a specific subject area, grade level
or student population;

S. "Unencumbered license" means a current, valid
authorization issued by a member state's licensing
authority allowing a person to serve as a teacher in P-12
public educational settings. An unencumbered license is not
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
a restricted, probationary, provisional, substitute or
temporary credential.

ARTICLE III
LICENSURE UNDER THE COMPACT

A. Licensure under this compact pertains only to the
initial grant of a license by the receiving state. Nothing
herein applies to any subsequent or ongoing compliance
requirements that a receiving state might require for
teachers.

B. Each member state shall, in accordance with the
rules of the commission, define, compile and update as
necessary a list of eligible licenses and career and
technical education licenses that the member state is
willing to consider for equivalency under this compact and
provide the list to the commission. The list shall include
those licenses that a receiving state is willing to grant
to teachers from other member states, pending a
determination of equivalency by the receiving state's
licensing authority.

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
C. Upon the receipt of an application for licensure
by a teacher holding an unencumbered eligible license, the
receiving state shall determine which of the receiving
state's eligible licenses the teacher is qualified to hold
and shall grant such a license or licenses to the
applicant. Such a determination shall be made in the sole
discretion of the receiving state's licensing authority and
may include a determination that the applicant is not
eligible for any of the receiving state's eligible
licenses. For all teachers who hold an unencumbered
license, the receiving state shall grant one (1) or more
unencumbered licenses that, in the receiving state's sole
discretion, are equivalent to the licenses held by the
teacher in any other member state.

D. For active military members and eligible military
spouses who hold a license that is not unencumbered, the
receiving state shall grant an equivalent license or
licenses that, in the receiving state's sole discretion, is
equivalent to the license or licenses held by the teacher
in any other member state, except where the receiving state
does not have an equivalent license.

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
E. For a teacher holding an unencumbered career and
technical education license, the receiving state shall
grant an unencumbered license equivalent to the career and
technical education license held by the applying teacher
and issued by another member state, as determined by the
receiving state in its sole discretion, except where a
career and technical education teacher does not hold a
bachelor's degree and the receiving state requires a
bachelor's degree for licenses to teach career and
technical education. A receiving state may require career
and technical education teachers to meet state industry
recognized requirements, if required by law in the
receiving state.

ARTICLE IV
LICENSURE NOT UNDER THE COMPACT

A. Except as provided in article III above, nothing
in this compact shall be construed to limit or inhibit the
power of a member state to regulate licensure or
endorsements overseen by the member state's licensing
authority.

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
B. When a teacher is required to renew a license
received pursuant to this compact, the state granting such
a license may require the teacher to complete state
specific requirements as a condition of licensure renewal
or advancement in that state.

C. For the purposes of determining compensation, a
receiving state may require additional information from
teachers receiving a license under the provisions of this
compact.

D. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to
limit the power of a member state to control and maintain
ownership of its information pertaining to teachers or
limit the application of a member state's laws or
regulations governing the ownership, use or dissemination
of information pertaining to teachers.

E. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to
invalidate or alter any existing agreement or other
cooperative arrangement which a member state may already be
a party to or limit the ability of a member state to
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
participate in any future agreement or other cooperative
arrangement to:

1. Award teaching licenses or other benefits
based on additional professional credentials, including but
not limited to national board certification;

2. Participate in the exchange of names of
teachers whose license has been subject to an adverse
action by a member state; or

3. Participate in any agreement or cooperative
arrangement with a non-member state.

ARTICLE V
TEACHER QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR LICENSURE UNDER
THE COMPACT

A. Except as provided for active military members or
eligible military spouses in article III.D above, a teacher
may only be eligible to receive a license under this
compact where that teacher holds an unencumbered license in
a member state.
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244

B. A teacher eligible to receive a license under this
compact shall, unless otherwise provided for herein:

1. Upon their application to receive a license
under this compact, undergo a criminal background check in
the receiving state in accordance with the laws and
regulations of the receiving state; and

2. Provide the receiving state with information
in addition to the information required for licensure for
the purposes of determining compensation, if applicable.

ARTICLE VI
DISCIPLINE / ADVERSE ACTIONS

A. Nothing in this compact shall be deemed or
construed to limit the authority of a member state to
investigate or impose disciplinary measures on teachers
according to the state practice laws thereof.

B. Member states shall be authorized to receive, and
shall provide, files and information regarding the
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
investigation and discipline, if any, of teachers in other
member states upon request. Any member state receiving such
information or files shall protect and maintain the
security and confidentiality thereof, in at least the same
manner that it maintains its own investigatory or
disciplinary files and information. Prior to disclosing any
disciplinary or investigatory information received from
another member state, the disclosing state shall
communicate its intention and purpose for such disclosure
to the member state which originally provided that
information.

ARTICLE VII
ESTABLISHMENT OF THE INTERSTATE TEACHER MOBILITY COMPACT
COMMISSION

A. The interstate compact member states hereby create
and establish a joint public agency known as the interstate
teacher mobility compact commission:

1. The commission is a joint interstate
governmental agency comprised of states that have enacted
the interstate teacher mobility compact;
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244

2. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to
be a waiver of sovereign immunity.

B. Membership, voting and meetings:

1. Each member state shall have and be limited
to one (1) delegate to the commission, who shall be given
the title of commissioner;

2. The commissioner shall be the primary
administrative officer of the state licensing authority or
their designee;

3. Any commissioner may be removed or suspended
from office as provided by the law of the state from which
the commissioner is appointed;

4. The member state shall fill any vacancy
occurring in the commission within ninety (90) days;

5. Each commissioner shall be entitled to one
(1) vote about the promulgation of rules and creation of
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to
participate in the business and affairs of the commission.
A commissioner shall vote in person or by such other means
as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for
commissioners' participation in meetings by telephone or
other means of communication;

6. The commission shall meet at least once
during each calendar year. Additional meetings shall be
held as set forth in the bylaws;

7. The commission shall establish by rule a term
of office for commissioners.

C. The commission shall have the following powers and
duties:

1. Establish a code of ethics for the
commission;

2. Establish the fiscal year of the commission;

3. Establish bylaws for the commission;
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244

4. Maintain its financial records in accordance
with the bylaws of the commission;

5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent
with the provisions of this compact, the bylaws and rules
of the commission;

6. Promulgate uniform rules to implement and
administer this compact. The rules shall have the force and
effect of law and shall be binding in all member states. In
the event the commission exercises its rulemaking authority
in a manner that is beyond the scope of the purposes of
this compact or the powers granted hereunder, then such an
action by the commission shall be invalid and have no force
and effect of law;

7. Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or
actions in the name of the commission, provided that the
standing of any member state licensing authority to sue or
be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;

8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244

9. Borrow, accept or contract for services of
personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a
member state or an associated non-governmental organization
that is open to membership by all states;

10. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers,
fix compensation, define duties, grant such persons
appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this
compact and establish the commission's personnel policies
and programs relating to conflicts of interest,
qualifications of personnel and other related personnel
matters;

11. Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or
donations of or otherwise own, hold, improve or use any
property, real, personal or mixed, provided that at all
times the commission shall avoid any appearance of
impropriety;

12. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease,
exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of any property
real, personal or mixed;
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244

13. Establish a budget and make expenditures;

14. Borrow money;

15. Appoint committees, including standing
committees composed of members and such other interested
persons as may be designated in this compact, rules or
bylaws;

16. Provide and receive information from, and
cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;

17. Establish and elect an executive committee;

18. Establish and develop a charter for an
executive information governance committee to advise on
facilitating exchange of information, use of information,
data privacy and technical support needs and provide
reports as needed;

19. Perform such other functions as may be
necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
compact consistent with the state regulation of teacher
licensure;

20. Determine whether a state's adopted language
is materially different from the model compact language
such that the state would not qualify for participation in
this compact.

D. The executive committee of the interstate teacher
mobility compact commission:

1. The executive committee shall have the power
to act on behalf of the commission according to the terms
of this compact;

2. The executive committee shall be composed of
eight (8) voting members:

a. The commission chair, vice chair and
treasurer; and

b. Five (5) members who are elected by the
commission from the current membership:
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244

i. Four (4) voting members
representing geographic regions in accordance with
commission rules; and

ii. One (1) at large voting member in
accordance with commission rules.

3. The commission may add or remove members of
the executive committee as provided in commission rules;

4. The executive committee shall meet at least
once annually;

5. The executive committee shall have the
following duties and responsibilities:

a. Recommend to the entire commission
changes to the rules or bylaws, changes to the compact
legislation, fees paid by compact member states such as
annual dues and any compact fee charged by the member
states on behalf of the commission;

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
b. Ensure commission administration
services are appropriately provided, contractual or
otherwise;

c. Prepare and recommend the budget;

d. Maintain financial records on behalf of
the commission;

e. Monitor compliance of member states and
provide reports to the commission;

f. Perform other duties as provided in
rules or bylaws.

6. Meetings of the commission:

a. All meetings shall be open to the public
and public notice of meetings shall be given in accordance
with commission bylaws;

b. The commission or the executive
committee or other committees of the commission may convene
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
in a closed, non-public meeting if the commission or
executive committee or other committees of the commission
shall discuss:

i. Non-compliance of a member state
with its obligations under this compact;

ii. The employment, compensation,
discipline or other matters, practices or procedures
related to specific employees or other matters related to
the commission's internal personnel practices and
procedures;

iii. Current, threatened or reasonably
anticipated litigation;

iv. Negotiation of contracts for the
purchase, lease or sale of goods, services or real estate;

v. Accusing any person of a crime or
formally censuring any person;

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
vi. Disclosure of trade secrets or
commercial or financial information that is privileged or
confidential;

vii. Disclosure of information of a
personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly
unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;

viii. Disclosure of investigative
records compiled for law enforcement purposes;

ix. Disclosure of information related
to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or
for use of the commission or other committee charged with
responsibility of investigation or determination of
compliance issues pursuant to this compact;

x. Matters specifically exempted from
disclosure by federal or member state statute;

xi. Others matters as set forth by
commission bylaws and rules.

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
c. If a meeting or portion of a meeting is
closed pursuant to this provision, the commission's legal
counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be
closed and shall reference each relevant exempting
provision;

d. The commission shall keep minutes of
commission meetings and shall provide a full and accurate
summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore,
including a description of the views expressed. All
documents considered in connection with an action shall be
identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a
closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release
by a majority vote of the commission or order of a court of
competent jurisdiction.

7. Financing of the commission:

a. The commission shall pay or provide for
the payment of the reasonable expenses of its
establishment, organization and ongoing activities;

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
b. The commission may accept all
appropriate donations and grants of money, equipment,
supplies, materials and services, and receive, utilize and
dispose of the same, provided that at all times the
commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or
conflict of interest;

c. The commission may levy on and collect
an annual assessment from each member state or impose fees
on other parties to cover the cost of the operations and
activities of the commission in accordance with the
commission rules;

d. The commission shall not incur
obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds
adequate to meet the same, nor shall the commission pledge
the credit of any of the member states, except by and with
the authority of the member state;

e. The commission shall keep accurate
accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts
and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to
accounting procedures established under commission bylaws.
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
All receipts and disbursements of funds of the commission
shall be reviewed annually in accordance with commission
bylaws and a report of the review shall be included in and
become part of the annual report of the commission.

8. Qualified immunity, defense and
indemnification:

a. The members, officers, executive
director, employees and representatives of the commission
shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally
or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to
or loss of property or personal injury or other civil
liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error or omission that occurred, or that the person
against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that
nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any
such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss,
injury or liability caused by the intentional or willful or
wanton misconduct of that person;

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
b. The commission shall defend any member,
officer, executive director, employee or representative of
the commission in any civil action seeking to impose
liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error
or omission that occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person
against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that
nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person
from retaining his or her own counsel, and provided
further, that the actual or alleged act, error or omission
did not result from that person's intentional or willful or
wanton misconduct;

c. The commission shall indemnify and hold
harmless any member, officer, executive director, employee
or representative of the commission for the amount of any
settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising
out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that
occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties
or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable
basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the
actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result
from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of
that person.

ARTICLE VIII
RULEMAKING

A. The commission shall exercise its rulemaking
powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this compact
and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments
shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule
or amendment.

B. The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules
to achieve the intent and purpose of this compact. In the
event the commission exercises its rulemaking authority in
a manner that is beyond the purpose and intent of this
compact, or the powers granted hereunder, then such an
action by the commission shall be invalid and have no force
and effect of law in the member states.

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
C. If a majority of the legislatures of the member
states rejects a rule, by enactment of a statute or
resolution in the same manner used to adopt this compact
within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the rule,
then such rule shall have no further force and effect in
any member state.

D. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted
or ratified at a regular or special meeting of the
commission in accordance with commission rules and bylaws.

E. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule with
forty-eight (48) hours' notice, with opportunity to
comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures
shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as
reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90)
days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes
of this provision, an emergency rule is one (1) that must
be adopted immediately in order to:

1. Meet an imminent threat to public health,
safety or welfare;
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244

2. Prevent a loss of commission or member state
funds;

3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an
administrative rule that is established by federal law or
rule; or

4. Protect public health and safety.

ARTICLE IX
FACILITATING INFORMATION EXCHANGE

A. The commission shall provide for facilitating the
exchange of information to administer and implement the
provisions of this compact in accordance with the rules of
the commission, consistent with generally accepted data
protection principles.

B. Nothing in this compact shall be deemed or
construed to alter, limit or inhibit the power of a member
state to control and maintain ownership of its licensee
information or alter, limit or inhibit the laws or
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
regulations governing licensee information in the member
state.

ARTICLE X
OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION AND ENFORCEMENT

A. Oversight:

1. The executive and judicial branches of state
government in each member state shall enforce this compact
and take all actions necessary and appropriate to
effectuate this compact's purposes and intent. The
provisions of this compact shall have standing as statutory
law;

2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by
or against the commission shall be brought solely and
exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the
principal office of the commission is located. The
commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to
the extent it adopts or consents to participate in
alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein
shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
in any action against a licensee for professional
malpractice, misconduct or any such similar matter;

3. All courts and all administrative agencies
shall take judicial notice of this compact, the rules of
the commission and any information provided to a member
state pursuant thereto in any judicial or quasi-judicial
proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject
matter of this compact or which may affect the powers,
responsibilities or actions of the commission;

4. The commission shall be entitled to receive
service of process in any proceeding regarding the
enforcement or interpretation of this compact and shall
have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all
purposes. Failure to provide the commission service of
process shall render a judgment or order void as to the
commission, this compact or promulgated rules.

B. Default, technical assistance and termination:

1. If the commission determines that a member
state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated
rules, the commission shall:

a. Provide written notice to the defaulting
state and other member states of the nature of the default,
the proposed means of curing the default or any other
action to be taken by the commission; and

b. Provide remedial training and specific
technical assistance regarding the default.

C. If a state in default fails to cure the default,
the defaulting state may be terminated from this compact
upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the commissioners
of the member states and all rights, privileges and
benefits conferred on that state by this compact may be
terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of
the default does not relieve the offending state of
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of
default.

D. Termination of membership in this compact shall be
imposed only after all other means of securing compliance
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or
terminate shall be given by the commission to the governor,
the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state's
legislature, the state licensing authority and each of the
member states.

E. A state that has been terminated is responsible
for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred
through the effective date of termination, including
obligations that extend beyond the effective date of
termination.

F. The commission shall not bear any costs related to
a state that is found to be in default or that has been
terminated from this compact, unless agreed upon in writing
between the commission and the defaulting state.

G. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the
commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the
District of Columbia or the federal district where the
commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party
shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorney's fees.
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244

H. Dispute resolution:

1. Upon request by a member state, the
commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to
this compact that arise among member states and between
member and non-member states;

2. The commission shall promulgate a rule
providing for both binding and non-binding alternative
dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.

I. Enforcement:

1. The commission, in the reasonable exercise of
its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of
this compact;

2. By majority vote, the commission may initiate
legal action in the United States District Court for the
District of Columbia or the federal district where the
commission has its principal offices against a member state
in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
this compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The
relief sought may include both injunctive relief and
damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary,
the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. The
remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the
commission. The commission may pursue any other remedies
available under federal or state law.

ARTICLE XI
EFFECTUATION, WITHDRAWAL AND AMENDMENT

A. This compact shall come into effect on the date on
which the compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth
member state.

1. On or after the effective date of this
compact, the commission shall convene and review the
enactment of each of the charter member states to determine
if the statute enacted by each such charter member state is
materially different from the model compact statute;

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
2. A charter member state whose enactment is
found to be materially different from the model compact
statute shall be entitled to the default process set forth
in article X;

3. Member states enacting this compact
subsequent to the charter member states shall be subject to
the process set forth in article VII.C.20 to determine if
their enactments are materially different from the model
compact statute and whether they qualify for participation
in this compact.

B. If any member state is later found to be in
default, or is terminated or withdraws from this compact,
the commission shall remain in existence and this compact
shall remain in effect even if the number of member states
should be less than ten (10).

C. Any state that joins this compact after the
commission's initial adoption of the rules and bylaws shall
be subject to the rules and bylaws as they exist on the
date on which this compact becomes law in that state. Any
rule that has been previously adopted by the commission
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
shall have the full force and effect of law on the day this
compact becomes law in that state, as the rules and bylaws
may be amended as provided in this compact.

D. Any member state may withdraw from this compact by
enacting a statute repealing the same.

1. A member state's withdrawal shall not take
effect until six (6) months after enactment of the
repealing statute;

2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing
requirement of the withdrawing state's licensing authority
to comply with the investigative and adverse action
reporting requirements of this act prior to the effective
date of withdrawal.

E. This compact may be amended by the member states.
No amendment to this compact shall become effective and
binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the
laws of all member states.

ARTICLE XII
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

This compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate the
purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be
severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision
of this compact is declared to be contrary to the
constitution of any member state or a state seeking
membership in this compact, or of the United States or the
applicability thereof to any other government, agency,
person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the
remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to
any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be
affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to
the constitution of any member state, this compact shall
remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member
states and in full force and effect as to the member state
affected as to all severable matters.

ARTICLE XIII
CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the
enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not
inconsistent with this compact.

B. Any laws, statutes, regulations or other legal
requirements in a member state in conflict with this
compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

C. All permissible agreements between the commission
and the member states are binding in accordance with the
agreements' terms.

Section 2. W.S. 7-19-106(a)(xxvi), 7-19-201(a)(iii),
21-2-403(a), 21-2-802(b), (d), (e)(intro), (i), (f), (k),
(m) and by creating new subsections (n) and (o),
21-2-906(a)(i), 21-3-308(h), 21-7-303(a), 21-7-304,
21-7-401, 21-13-309(m)(v)(D)(II), 25-12-101(b)(i) and (ii)
and 33-1-115(a)(ii)(C) are amended to read:

7-19-106. Access to, and dissemination of,
information.

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
(a) Criminal history record information shall be
disseminated by criminal justice agencies in this state,
whether directly or through any intermediary, only to:

(xxvi) The Wyoming professional teaching
standards board for purposes of obtaining background
information on applications for certification, licensure
under the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact pursuant to
W.S. 21-26-102 and if requested by a school district, to
school district boards of trustees for obtaining background
information on employees who may have access to minors in
the course of employment;

7-19-201. State or national criminal history record
information.

(a) The following persons shall be required to submit
to fingerprinting in order to obtain state and national
criminal history record information:

(iii) Applicants for initial certification by
the professional teaching standards board or licensure
under the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact under W.S.
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
21-26-102 and employees initially hired by a school
district on or after July 1, 1996, who may have access to
minors in the course of their employment. In accordance
with W.S. 21-3-111(a)(xxi), employees of a school district
who meet the qualifications of this paragraph shall also be
required to submit to fingerprinting for purposes of this
subsection upon request of, and payment of applicable fees
by, the employing school district;

21-2-403. Licensing and regulation of qualifications
of agents of private schools and institutions; fee.

(a) Agents of those schools or institutions specified
under W.S. 21-2-401(a) or (b) who operate in the state and
agents employed to solicit resident students by schools or
institutions located outside the state which are similar to
schools or institutions specified under W.S. 21-2-401(a) or
(b), shall be licensed under this article or licensed under
the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact pursuant to W.S.
21-26-102 before soliciting students and representing
schools or institutions in this state.

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
21-2-802. Powers and duties; teacher certification;
suspension and revocation; certification fees; disposition
of collected fees; required data submissions to department
of education.

(b) The board may enter into reciprocal agreements
with other states for the purposes of granting
certification pursuant to this section. The authority
provided to the board under this subsection to issue
reciprocal certifications to teachers in this state shall
be separate from and in addition to the authority provided
to the board in accordance with the Interstate Teacher
Mobility Compact under W.S. 21-26-102.

(c) The board may revoke, suspend, deny or refuse to
renew certification, including certification under the
Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact under W.S. 21-26-102,
for incompetency, conviction of a felony committed after
July 1, 1996, immorality and other reprehensible conduct or
gross neglect of duty or knowing misrepresentation of
information on an application or resume, upon its own
motion or upon the petition of any local board of trustees.
Except as provided in subsection (k) of this section, no
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
certificate shall be revoked or suspended without a hearing
conducted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative
Procedure Act, unless the person holding the certification
waives the right to a hearing.

(d) The board may establish reasonable fees for
application and issuance of certification under this
section or in accordance with the Interstate Teacher
Mobility Compact under W.S. 21-26-102 and may require the
payment of fees as a condition for issuing any certificate.
The fees may include the costs associated with the criminal
history background check required by paragraph (e)(ii) of
this section and the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact by
W.S. 21-26-102. Fees collected by the board pursuant to
this subsection shall be deposited with the state treasurer
or with the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact Commission
as specified by W.S. 21-26-102. Upon receipt, the state
treasurer shall credit the revenues to a separate account.
Expenditures from the account shall be for expenses
incurred by the board in administering this article.

(e) No certification shall be issued under this
section or in accordance with the Interstate Teacher
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
Mobility Compact under W.S. 21-26-102 until a criminal
history background check has been filed with and received
by the board, the applicant provides a release of
information and the applicant consents to the release of
any criminal history information to the board and if
applicable, to the employing school district. Upon receipt
of a background report pursuant to this subsection or the
Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact under W.S. 21-26-102
indicating that the applicant has a conviction equal to a
felony under Wyoming law or any conviction for an act which
would constitute a violation under chapter 2 or chapter 4
of title 6 of the Wyoming statutes, the board shall
immediately provide a copy of the report to the employing
local school board if the information involves a certified
individual employed by that local board and if the local
board has requested a copy of the report. For all persons
seeking initial certification under this section or in
accordance with the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact
under W.S. 21-26-102 on or after July 1, 1996:

(i) The applicant shall be required to verify
under oath whether he has been convicted of a felony. The
board may deny certification of under this section or under
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact under W.S.
21-26-102 for any applicant who has been convicted of a
felony that relates to the practice of teaching or to the
ability to practice as a teacher and may annul a
certificate under this section or under the Interstate
Teacher Mobility Compact under W.S. 21-26-102 for
misrepresentation by an applicant of his criminal history.
Any felony related to a sexual offense shall be considered
to relate to the practice of teaching. Action by the board
to annul a certificate under this section or under the
Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact under W.S. 21-26-102
shall be taken following a hearing conducted in accordance
with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, unless the
person holding the certification under this section or
under the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact under W.S.
21-26-102 waives the right to a hearing;

(f) Any local school board dismissing or accepting
the resignation of a person holding certification under
this section or in accordance with the Interstate Teacher
Mobility Compact under W.S. 21-26-102 shall notify the
professional standards teaching board of the dismissal or
resignation, if the dismissal or acceptance of the
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
resignation was based in whole or in part upon the person's
conviction of a felony.

(k) Upon receipt from the department of family
services of a certified copy of an order from a court to
withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by
the board or issued pursuant to the Interstate Teacher
Mobility Compact under W.S. 21-26-102, the board shall
notify the party named in the court order of the
withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in
accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal
under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be
allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted
under this subsection.

(m) In accordance with criteria and guidelines
established by the state superintendent of public
instruction, the board shall submit data elements collected
from school administrators, teachers and other school
district personnel certified under this article or in
accordance with the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact
under W.S. 21-26-102 to the department of education for
housing in the department's data base repository.
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244

(n) The board shall administer the provisions of the
Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact under W.S. 21-26-102,
including factoring the annual assessment required under
the compact into the board's biennium budget and
promulgating any rules necessary for implementation of the
compact.

(o) The board shall issue a teacher certification to
an applicant who is certified in a member state in
accordance with the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact
under W.S. 21-26-102.

21-2-906. Duties of the state superintendent.

(a) The state superintendent of public instruction
shall:

(i) Establish a certification process for
education service providers, including teachers licensed
under the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact pursuant to
W.S. 21-26-102, which shall ensure ESA students attending
qualified schools in kindergarten through grade twelve (12)
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
receive instruction in reading, writing, mathematics,
civics, history, literature and science throughout their
kindergarten through grade twelve (12) tenure, and for
pre-kindergarten ensure ESA students at minimum receive
instruction necessary for preparation to enter
kindergarten;

21-3-308. Hearing by authorizer; prohibited actions
by authorizer; criteria; compliance with state standards;
contractual authority.

(h) Those teachers employed on a full-time basis in
the charter school system shall be subject to the same
requirements with respect to certification by the Wyoming
professional teaching standards board under W.S. 21-2-802
and in accordance with the Interstate Teacher Mobility
Compact under W.S. 21-26-102 and other qualifications as
any other teachers authorized to teach in Wyoming public
schools.

21-7-303. Certificate or permit required; exception.

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b),
(c) or (d) of this section, no person shall teach or
supervise in a public school in this state and receive
compensation therefor out of any public fund who at the
time of rendering such services is not a holder of or a
candidate and qualified for a certificate or permit issued
or to be issued under the laws of this state or in
accordance with the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact
under W.S. 21-26-102, and the rules and regulations of the
Wyoming professional teaching standards board pursuant to
W.S. 21-2-802.

21-7-304. Candidate for certificate must pass
examination on state and federal constitutions.

All persons hereafter applying for certificates authorizing
them to become administrators or teachers in the public
schools of this state, including teachers applying for
licensure under the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact
under W.S. 21-26-102, shall before receiving such
certificate be required to pass a satisfactory examination
upon the provisions and principles of the constitutions of
the United States and the state of Wyoming or present
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
evidence of having successfully completed a course
equivalent to that required in W.S. 21-9-102.

21-7-401. Boards of trustees to require criminal
history background information.

The board of trustees of each school district within the
state shall require any employee initially hired by the
school board on or after July 1, 1996, who may have access
to minors to submit to fingerprinting for the purpose of
obtaining state or national criminal history record
information before employment. The provisions of this
section shall not apply to persons certificated under W.S.
21-2-802 or under the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact
under W.S. 21-26-102 who have met the requirements of this
section pursuant to the certification process.

21-13-309. Determination of amount to be included in
foundation program for each district.

(m) In determining the amount to be included in the
foundation program for each district, the state
superintendent shall:
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244

(v) Based upon ADM computations and identified
school configurations within each district pursuant to
paragraph (iv) of this subsection, compute the foundation
program amount for each district as prescribed by the
education resource block grant model adopted by the Wyoming
legislature as defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv), as
contained within the spreadsheets and accompanying reports
referenced under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii). The following
criteria shall be used by the state superintendent in the
administration of the education resource block grant model:

(D) Career and technical education
computations within the education resource block grant
model shall be based upon:

(II) Career and technical education
programs offered in grades nine (9) through twelve (12)
consisting of a sequence of three (3) or more career and
technical courses in an occupational area or career cluster
that provides students with the technical knowledge, skills
or proficiencies necessary to obtain employment in current
or emerging occupations or to pursue advanced skill
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
training. To qualify under this subdivision, a career and
technical course shall be offered pursuant to W.S.
21-9-101(b)(i)(J) and aligned with state content and
performance standards prescribed by the state board of
education under W.S. 21-2-304(a)(iii), and except as
provided under W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xxvii), shall be provided
by a teacher certified by the Wyoming professional teaching
standards board or in accordance with the Interstate
Teacher Mobility Compact under W.S. 21-26-102 for the
career and technical subject area associated with the
course;

25-12-101. Wyoming school for the deaf;
establishment; purpose; supervision.

(b) The Wyoming school for the deaf shall be operated
and maintained under the general supervision of the
superintendent of public instruction pursuant to W.S.
21-2-202. The superintendent shall promulgate rules and
regulations for the administration of the program and shall
facilitate continued cooperation with Natrona county school
district number 1. The school shall be staffed as follows:

SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
(i) Except for substitute teachers who shall
hold a substitute teaching permit, teachers at the school
shall hold a Wyoming standard teaching certificate or be
licensed under the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact
under W.S. 21-26-102, including an endorsement for deaf
education;

(ii) The administrator at the school shall hold
a Wyoming standard teaching certificate or be licensed
under the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact under W.S.
21-26-102, including endorsements for deaf education and
school principal;

33-1-115. Professional assistance programs for health
care providers and others as specified; confidentiality of
records.

(a) As used in this section:

(ii) "Licensee" means:

(C) Any individual teaching in a public
school pursuant to a certificate or permit issued under the
SF0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0244
laws of this state, including licensure under the
Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact under W.S. 21-26-102,
by the Wyoming professional teaching standards board.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0072